West Virginia, session 2025, SB715.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10D. CONSOLIDATED PUBLIC RETIREMENT BOARD. §5-10D-15. Confidential information exempt from disclosure. Due to the increased risk of fraud and personal identity theft, all information contained in the records maintained by the Consolidated Public Retirement Board for all retirement systems  administered pursuant to this article that would tend to disclose personally identifiable information of a member, retirant, beneficiary or alternate payee are confidential and exempt from disclosure under the provisions of §29B-1-1 et seq. of this code. This information includes, without limitation, social security numbers, account numbers, dates of birth, addresses, telephone numbers, e-mail addresses, medical or disability information and direct deposit information. Members, retirants, beneficiaries, alternate payees, or persons authorized by them, are permitted access to their own information.